Massachusetts, session 194th, H5059.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 222 the 
following chapter:-  
CHAPTER 223. MASSACHUSETTS JUDICIAL SECURITY ACT  
Section 1. For the purposes of this chapter the following words shall, unless the context 
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:  
“Data broker”, an entity that collects and sells or licenses to third parties the personal 
information of an individual with whom the entity does not have a direct relationship. 
“Government agency”, a legal entity of state government established by the general court 
or by executive order as an agency, board, bureau, commission, council, department office or 
division within the executive branch of the commonwealth with a specific mission and which is 
subject to the control of the governor or a quasi-public entity.  

of 6 12  "Immediate family", a judicial officer’s spouse, child or parent or any other blood relative 
who lives in the same primary residence as the officer.  
“Judicial officer”, an actively employed or former: (i) justice of the supreme judicial 
court or appeals court; (ii) judge of the trial court; (iii) judge of the First Circuit Court of 
Appeals; (iv) judge or magistrate judge of the federal district court for the district of 
Massachusetts; (v) judge of the United States bankruptcy court; or (vi) appointed clerks of court 
given the title of magistrate by section 62B of chapter 221.  
"Personal information", the home address, home telephone number, mobile telephone 
number, or personal email address of a judicial officer or immediate family member.  
Section 2. (a) The office of court management within the trial court established by section 
6B of chapter 211B shall administer a system to ensure the confidentiality of the personal 
information of judicial officers and their immediate family, including establishing and 
maintaining a confidential database of judicial officers, their immediate family and personal 
information.  
(b) A judicial officer or their representative may submit a written request to the office 
signed by the judicial officer specifying that they wish to keep from being made public particular 
items of personal information and the identity and information of listed immediate family 
members. The judicial officer may include with this request a list of persons, businesses and 
associations they wish to bar from making this personal information public. At any time after 
submitting their confidentiality request to the office, the judicial officer may request further 
notice be given to additional listed persons, businesses or associations. 

of 6 33  (c)  The office shall, upon receipt of this request, immediately add the requested personal 
information into the confidential database and within 72 hours notify all government agencies 
and each person, business and association listed in the request. This notice shall be in writing and 
contain information necessary to ensure compliance with this chapter, including information 
outlining: (i) the requirements for removing personal information; (ii) the prohibition on the 
posting or transfer of personal information; (iii) the potential penalties for violations of theses 
prohibitions; and (iv) contact information to allow the recipient to verify the accuracy of the 
notice and answer questions regarding the notice.   
(c) A judicial officer shall promptly notify the office of any change in personal 
information or immediate family information.  
(e) The office shall promulgate regulations to effectuate this section including the manner 
and form of the request and develop procedures to review and process written requests and to 
respond to a data broker’s confirmation request as required in section 4. 
Section 3. (a) No government agency may publicly post or display publicly available 
content that includes the personal information of a judicial officer or their immediate family. 
(b) A government agency, upon notice by the office of court management, shall within 72 
hours remove the personal information from existing publicly available content and ensure that 
the information is not made available to the public on any website or subsidiary website 
controlled by the agency. 
(c) This section shall not prohibit a government agency from disclosing the personal 
information if: (i) directed by a court order; (ii) requested by a law enforcement agency; (iii) 

of 6 54 requested by a financial institution or title company for bona fide business purposes; or (iv) 
presented with a release permitting disclosure by the judicial officer. 
Section 4. (a) No data broker shall knowingly sell, license, trade for consideration, 
transfer or purchase personal information of a judicial officer or their immediate family. 
(b) Prior to all sale or license of personal data, a data broker shall confirm with the office 
of court management the absence of any personal information contained within the confidential 
database created in section 2. 
(c) This section shall not apply to commercial entities engaged in the following activities: 
(i) using personal information internally or selling or providing data for transaction or service 
requested by or concerning the individual whose personal information is being transferred; (ii) 
providing publicly available information via real-time or near real-time alert services for health 
or safety purposes; (iii) a consumer reporting agency subject to the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 
U.S.C. 1681, et seq.); (iv) a financial institution subject to the Gramm-Each-Bliley Act (Public 
Law 106-102) and regulations implementing that Act; (v) a covered entity for purposes of the 
privacy regulations promulgated under section 264(c) of the Health Insurance Portability and 
Accountability Act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. 1320d-2 note); and (vi) the collection and sale or 
licensing of personal information incidental to conducting the activities described in this sub-
paragraph. 
Section 5. (a) No person, business, or association shall publicly post or display the 
personal information of a judicial officer or their immediate family after receiving notice from 
the office of court management that the judicial officer requests confidentiality.   

of 6 75  (b) After receiving notice, the person, business, or association shall, within 24 hours 
remove the personal information from existing publicly available content and ensure that the 
information is not made available to the public on any website or subsidiary website controlled 
by that person, business or association. 
(c) After receiving notice, no person, business, or association shall transfer the personal 
information to any other person, business, or association through any medium.  
(d) This section shall not apply to personal information: (i) voluntarily published by the 
judicial officer or their immediate family; (ii) released pursuant to a court order as permitted in 
section 7; or (iii) lawfully received from a government source. 
Section 6. (a) A judicial officer whose personal information or immediate family 
information is transferred or made public as a result of a violation of this chapter may bring an 
action seeking injunctive or declaratory relief in any court of competent jurisdiction. If the court 
grants injunctive or declaratory relief, the government agency, data broker, person, business or 
association responsible for the violation shall be required to pay the judicial officer’s costs and 
reasonable attorney's fees.  
(b) A knowing violation of a court order granting injunctive or declaratory relief under 
this chapter shall result in an award to the aggrieved party of actual damages, court costs and 
reasonable attorney’s fees. 
Section 7. The office of court management shall not release personal information from 
the confidential database without the express written consent of the judicial officer except for 
court-ordered use as part of a news story, commentary, editorial or other speech on a matter of 

of 6 96 public concern based on a judicial finding that the right of the public to the release of the 
information outweighs the privacy interests or safety concerns of the judicial officer.   
Section 8. This Act shall take effect 120 days after the date of enactment of this Act.  
SECTION 2. Section 4 of chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
100 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after subsection (e) the following subsection:- 
101  (f) The name and address of any judicial officer or their immediate family, as both terms 
102 are defined in section 1 of chapter 9B, upon request shall not appear on the street list and such 
103 names shall not be disclosed to any person.